Illinois, session 104th, SB3706.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Adoption Act is amended by changing Section 518.3a as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 50/18.3a)  (from Ch. 40, par. 1522.3a)7    Sec. 18.3a. Confidential intermediary. 8    (a) General purposes. Notwithstanding any other provision 9of this Act, 10        (1) any adopted or surrendered person 21 years of age 11    or over; or12        (2) any adoptive parent or legal guardian of an 13    adopted or surrendered person under the age of 21; or14        (3) any birth parent of an adopted or surrendered 15    person who is 21 years of age or over; or16        (4) any adult child or adult grandchild of a deceased 17    adopted or surrendered person; or18        (5) any adoptive parent or surviving spouse of a 19    deceased adopted or surrendered person; or20        (6) any adult birth sibling of the adult adopted or 21    surrendered person unless the birth parent has checked 22    Option E on the Birth Parent Preference Form or has filed a 23    Denial of Information Exchange with the Registry and is   SB3706 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1    not deceased; or2        (7) any adult adopted birth sibling of an adult 3    adopted or surrendered person; or4        (8) any adult birth sibling of the birth parent if the 5    birth parent is deceased; or6        (9) any birth grandparent 7may petition the court in any county in the State of Illinois 8for appointment of a confidential intermediary as provided in 9this Section for the purpose of exchanging medical information 10with one or more mutually consenting biological relatives, 11obtaining identifying information about one or more mutually 12consenting biological relatives, or arranging contact with one 13or more mutually consenting biological relatives. The 14petitioner shall be required to accompany his or her petition 15with proof of registration with the Illinois Adoption Registry 16and Medical Information Exchange.17    (a-4) The adoptive parent or legal guardian of an adopted 18or surrendered person under the age of 21 may also petition the 19court for the appointment of a confidential intermediary for 20purposes of obtaining identifying information or arranging 21contact with a mutually consenting adoptive parent or legal 22guardian of a birth sibling of the petitioner's adopted or 23surrendered child under the age of 21. 24    (a-5) In addition, any former youth in care as defined in 25Section 4d of the Children and Family Services Act who was 26adopted or surrendered may petition the court in any county in   SB3706 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1the State for appointment of a confidential intermediary as 2provided in this Section for the purposes of obtaining 3identifying information or arranging contact with (i) siblings 4or birth relatives if the former youth in care is between the 5ages of 18 and 21 or (ii) former foster parents or foster 6siblings if the former youth in care is over the age of 18. A 7petitioner under this subsection is not required to register 8with the Illinois Adoption Registry and Medical Information 9Exchange. 10    (b) Petition. Upon petition, the court shall appoint a 11confidential intermediary. The petition shall indicate if the 12petitioner wants to do any one or more of the following as to 13the sought-after relative or relatives: exchange medical 14information with the biological relative or relatives, obtain 15identifying information from the biological relative or 16relatives, or to arrange contact with the biological relative.17    (c) Order. The order appointing the confidential 18intermediary shall allow that intermediary to conduct a search 19for the sought-after relative by accessing those records 20described in subsection (g) of this Section.21    (d) Fees and expenses. The court shall not condition the 22appointment of the confidential intermediary on the payment of 23the intermediary's fees and expenses in advance of the 24commencement of the work of the confidential intermediary. No 25fee shall be charged to any petitioner.26    (e) Eligibility of intermediary. The court may appoint as   SB3706 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1confidential intermediary any person certified by the 2Department of Children and Family Services as qualified to 3serve as a confidential intermediary. Certification shall be 4dependent upon the confidential intermediary completing a 5course of training including, but not limited to, applicable 6federal and State privacy laws.7    (f) (Blank).8    (g) Confidential intermediary access to information. 9Subject to the limitations of subsection (i) of this Section, 10the confidential intermediary shall have access to vital 11records maintained by the Department of Public Health and its 12local designees for the maintenance of vital records, or a 13comparable public entity that maintains vital records in 14another state in accordance with that state's laws, and all 15records of the court or any adoption agency, public or 16private, as limited in this Section, which relate to the 17adoption or the identity and location of an adopted or 18surrendered person, of an adult child or surviving spouse of a 19deceased adopted or surrendered person, or of a birth parent, 20birth sibling, or the sibling of a deceased birth parent. The 21confidential intermediary shall not have access to any 22personal health information protected by the Standards for 23Privacy of Individually Identifiable Health Information 24adopted by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services 25under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act 26of 1996 unless the confidential intermediary has obtained   SB3706 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1written consent from the person whose information is being 2sought by an adult adopted or surrendered person or, if that 3person is a minor child, that person's parent or guardian. 4Confidential intermediaries shall be authorized to inspect 5confidential relinquishment and adoption records. The 6confidential intermediary shall not be authorized to access 7medical records, financial records, credit records, banking 8records, home studies, attorney file records, or other 9personal records. In cases where a birth parent is being 10sought, an adoption agency shall inform the confidential 11intermediary of any statement filed pursuant to Section 18.3, 12hereinafter referred to as "the 18.3 statement", indicating a 13desire of the surrendering birth parent to have identifying 14information shared or to not have identifying information 15shared. Information provided to the confidential intermediary 16by an adoption agency shall be restricted to the full name, 17date of birth, place of birth, last known address, last known 18telephone number of the sought-after relative or, if 19applicable, of the children or siblings of the sought-after 20relative, and the 18.3 statement. If the petitioner is an 21adult adopted or surrendered person or the adoptive parent of 22a minor and if the petitioner has signed a written 23authorization to disclose personal medical information, an 24adoption agency disclosing information to a confidential 25intermediary shall disclose available medical information 26about the adopted or surrendered person from birth through   SB3706 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1adoption. 2    (h) Disclosure of information Missing or lost original 3birth certificate; remedy. Disclosure of information by the 4confidential intermediary shall be consistent with the public 5policy and intent of laws granting original birth certificate 6access as expressed in Section 18.04 of this Act. The 7confidential intermediary shall comply with the following 8procedures in disclosing information to the petitioners:9        (1) If the petitioner is an adult adopted or 10    surrendered person, or the adult child, adult grandchild, 11    or surviving spouse of a deceased adopted or surrendered 12    person, the confidential intermediary shall disclose: 13            (A) Missing or lost original birth certificate; 14        remedy. Identifying identifying information about the 15        birth parent of the adopted person and about the adult 16        adopted or surrendered person, which, in the ordinary 17        course of business, would have been reflected on the 18        original filed certificate of birth, as of the date of 19        birth, only if:20                (i) the adopted person was born before January 21            1, 1946 and the petitioner has requested a 22            non-certified copy of the adopted person's 23            original birth certificate under Section 18.1 of 24            this Act, and the Illinois Department of Public 25            Health has issued a certification that the 26            original birth certificate was not found, or the   SB3706 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1            petitioner has presented the confidential 2            intermediary with the non-certified copy of the 3            original birth certificate which omits the name of 4            the birth parent;5                (ii) the adopted person was born after January 6            1, 1946, and the petitioner has requested a 7            non-certified copy of the adopted person's 8            original birth certificate under Section 18.1 of 9            this Act and the Illinois Department of Public 10            Health has issued a certification that the 11            original birth certificate was not found.12            In providing information pursuant to this 13        subdivision (h)(1)(A), the confidential intermediary 14        shall expressly inform the petitioner in writing that 15        since the identifying information is not from an 16        official original certificate of birth filed pursuant 17        to the Vital Records Act, the confidential 18        intermediary cannot attest to the complete accuracy of 19        the information and the confidential intermediary 20        shall not be liable if the information disclosed is 21        not accurate. Only information from the court files 22        shall be provided to the petitioner in this Section. 23        If the identifying information concerning a birth 24        father is sought by the petitioner, the confidential 25        intermediary shall disclose only the identifying 26        information of the birth father as defined in Section   SB3706 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1        18.06 of this Act; 2            (B) the name of the child welfare agency which had 3        legal custody of the surrendered person or 4        responsibility for placing, or assisting in the 5        placement of, the surrendered person and any available 6        contact information for such agency; 7            (C) the name of the state in which the surrender 8        occurred and or in which the adoption was finalized; 9        and 10            (D) any information for which the sought-after 11        relative has provided his or her consent to disclose 12        under paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (i) of 13        this Section. 14        (2) If the petitioner is an adult adopted or 15    surrendered person, or the adoptive parent of an adult 16    adopted or surrendered person under the age of 21, or the 17    adoptive parent of a deceased adopted or surrendered 18    person, or the adult child or grandchild of a deceased 19    adopted or surrendered person, the confidential 20    intermediary shall provide, in addition to the information 21    listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection (h):22            (A) subject to subsection (g), any information 23        which the adoption agency provides pursuant to 24        subsection (i) of this Section pertaining to medical 25        information about the adopted or surrendered person; 26        and   SB3706 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1            (B) any non-identifying information, as defined in 2        Section 18.4 of this Act, that is obtained during the 3        search.4        (3) If the petitioner is not defined in paragraph (1) 5    or (2) of this subsection, the confidential intermediary 6    shall provide to the petitioner:7            (A) any information for which the sought-after 8        relative has provided his or her consent under 9        paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (i) of this 10        Section; 11            (B) the name of the child welfare agency which had 12        legal custody of the surrendered person or 13        responsibility for placing, or assisting in the 14        placement of, the surrendered person and any available 15        contact information for such agency; and 16            (C) the name of the state in which the surrender 17        occurred or in which the adoption was finalized.18    (h-5) Disclosure of information shall be made by the 19confidential intermediary at any time from the appointment of 20the confidential intermediary and the court's issuance of an 21order of dismissal. 22    (i) Duties of confidential intermediary in conducting a 23search. In conducting a search under this Section, the 24confidential intermediary shall first determine whether there 25is a Denial of Information Exchange or a Birth Parent 26Preference Form with Option E selected or an 18.3 statement   SB3706 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1referenced in subsection (g) of this Section on file with the 2Illinois Adoption Registry. If there is a denial, the Birth 3Parent Preference Form on file with the Registry and the birth 4parent who completed the form selected Option E, or if there is 5an 18.3 statement indicating the birth parent's intent not to 6have identifying information shared and the birth parent did 7not later file an Information Exchange Authorization with the 8Registry, the confidential intermediary must discontinue the 9search unless 5 years or more have elapsed since the execution 10of the Denial of Information Exchange, Birth Parent Preference 11Form, or the 18.3 statement. If a birth parent was previously 12the subject of a search through the State confidential 13intermediary program, the confidential intermediary shall 14inform the petitioner of the need to discontinue the search 15until 10 years or more have elapsed since the initial search 16was closed. In cases where a birth parent has been the object 17of 2 searches through the State confidential intermediary 18program, no subsequent search for the birth parent shall be 19authorized absent a court order to the contrary.20    In conducting a search under this Section, the 21confidential intermediary shall attempt to locate the relative 22or relatives from whom the petitioner has requested 23information. If the sought-after relative is deceased or 24cannot be located after a diligent search, the confidential 25intermediary may contact other adult relatives of the 26sought-after relative.  SB3706 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1    The confidential intermediary shall contact a sought-after 2relative on behalf of the petitioner in a manner that respects 3the sought-after relative's privacy and shall inform the 4sought-after relative of the petitioner's request for medical 5information, identifying information or contact as stated in 6the petition. Based upon the terms of the petitioner's 7request, the confidential intermediary shall contact a 8sought-after relative on behalf of the petitioner and inform 9the sought-after relative of the following options:10        (1) The sought-after relative may totally reject one 11    or all of the requests for medical information, 12    identifying information or contact. The sought-after 13    relative shall be informed that they can provide a medical 14    questionnaire to be forwarded to the petitioner without 15    releasing any identifying information. The confidential 16    intermediary shall inform the petitioner of the 17    sought-after relative's decision to reject the sharing of 18    information or contact.19        (2) The sought-after relative may consent to 20    completing a medical questionnaire only. In this case, the 21    confidential intermediary shall provide the questionnaire 22    and ask the sought-after relative to complete it. The 23    confidential intermediary shall forward the completed 24    questionnaire to the petitioner and inform the petitioner 25    of the sought-after relative's desire to not provide any 26    additional information.  SB3706 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1        (3) The sought-after relative may communicate with the 2    petitioner without having his or her identity disclosed. 3    In this case, the confidential intermediary shall arrange 4    the desired communication in a manner that protects the 5    identity of the sought-after relative. The confidential 6    intermediary shall inform the petitioner of the 7    sought-after relative's decision to communicate but not 8    disclose his or her identity.9        (4) The sought-after relative may consent to initiate 10    contact with the petitioner. The confidential intermediary 11    shall obtain written consents from both parties that they 12    wish to disclose their identities to each other and to 13    have contact with each other.14    (j) Oath. The confidential intermediary shall sign an oath 15of confidentiality substantially as follows: "I, .........., 16being duly sworn, on oath depose and say: As a condition of 17appointment as a confidential intermediary, I affirm that:18        (1) I will not disclose to the petitioner, directly or 19    indirectly, any confidential information except in a 20    manner consistent with the law.21        (2) I recognize that violation of this oath subjects 22    me to civil liability and to a potential finding of 23    contempt of court. ................................24SUBSCRIBED AND SWORN to before me, a Notary Public, on (insert 25date)26................................."  SB3706 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1    (k) Sanctions.2        (1) Any confidential intermediary who improperly 3    discloses confidential information identifying a 4    sought-after relative shall be liable to the sought-after 5    relative for damages and may also be found in contempt of 6    court.7        (2) Any person who learns a sought-after relative's 8    identity, directly or indirectly, through the use of 9    procedures provided in this Section and who improperly 10    discloses information identifying the sought-after 11    relative shall be liable to the sought-after relative for 12    actual damages plus minimum punitive damages of $10,000.13        (3) The Department shall fine any confidential 14    intermediary who improperly discloses confidential 15    information in violation of item (1) or (2) of this 16    subsection (k) an amount up to $2,000 per improper 17    disclosure. This fine does not affect civil liability 18    under item (2) of this subsection (k). The Department 19    shall deposit all fines and penalties collected under this 20    Section into the Illinois Adoption Registry and Medical 21    Information Fund.22    (l) Death of person being sought. Notwithstanding any 23other provision of this Act, if the confidential intermediary 24discovers that the person being sought has died, he or she 25shall report this fact to the court, along with a copy of the 26death certificate. If the sought-after relative is a birth   SB3706 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1parent, the confidential intermediary shall also forward a 2copy of the birth parent's death certificate, if available, to 3the Registry for inclusion in the Registry file.4    (m) Any confidential information obtained by the 5confidential intermediary during the course of his or her 6search shall be kept strictly confidential and shall be used 7for the purpose of arranging contact between the petitioner 8and the sought-after birth relative. At the time the case is 9closed, all identifying information shall be returned to the 10court for inclusion in the impounded adoption file.11    (n) (Blank).12    (o) Except as provided in subsection (k) of this Section, 13no liability shall accrue to the State, any State agency, any 14judge, any officer or employee of the court, any certified 15confidential intermediary, or any agency designated to oversee 16confidential intermediary services for acts, omissions, or 17efforts made in good faith within the scope of this Section.18    (p) An adoption agency that has received a request from a 19confidential intermediary for the full name, date of birth, 20last known address, or last known telephone number of a 21sought-after relative pursuant to subsection (g) of Section 2218.3a, or for medical information regarding a sought-after 23relative pursuant to subsection (h) of Section 18.3a, must 24satisfactorily comply with this court order within a period of 2545 days. The court shall order the adoption agency to 26reimburse the petitioner in an amount equal to all payments   SB3706 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1made by the petitioner to the confidential intermediary, and 2the adoption agency shall be subject to a civil monetary 3penalty of $1,000 to be paid to the Department of Children and 4Family Services. Following the issuance of a court order 5finding that the adoption agency has not complied with Section 618.3, the adoption agency shall be subject to a monetary 7penalty of $500 per day for each subsequent day of 8non-compliance. Proceeds from such fines shall be utilized by 9the Department of Children and Family Services to subsidize 10the fees of petitioners as referenced in subsection (d) of 11this Section.12    (q) (Blank). 13    Any reimbursements and fines, notwithstanding any 14reimbursement directly to the petitioner, paid under this 15subsection are in addition to other remedies a court may 16otherwise impose by law.17    The Department of Children and Family Services shall 18submit reports to the Adoption Registry-Confidential 19Intermediary Advisory Council by July 1 and January 1 of each 20year in order to report the penalties assessed and collected 21under this subsection, the amounts of related deposits into 22the DCFS Children's Services Fund, and any expenditures from 23such deposits. 24    (r) A confidential intermediary shall be permitted to 25access information from closed child welfare agencies whose 26records are housed in the State Central Storage consistent   SB3706 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20671 JRC 34170 b1with paragraph (g) for all petitioners. If the petitioner is 2an adult adopted or surrendered person, the adoptive parent of 3an adult adopted person under the age of 21, or the adoptive 4parent of a deceased adopted or surrendered person, or an 5adult child or grandchild of a deceased adopted or surrendered 6person, the confidential intermediary may request any 7non-identifying information, including any available medical 8information about the adopted or surrendered person from birth 9through adoption, any non-identifying information described in 10Section 18.4, and the Section 18.3 statement, and, subject to 11subsection (g), the confidential intermediary shall disclose 12the non-identifying information to a petitioner who is an 13adult adopted or surrendered person, the adoptive parent of an 14adult adopted person under the age of 21, the adoptive parent 15of a deceased adopted or surrendered person, or an adult child 16or grandchild of a deceased adopted or surrendered person. 17(Source: P.A. 104-69, eff. 1-1-26.)